Missouri, session 2026, SB1195.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 321, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 321.295, to read as
follows:
321.295. 1. The board of directors of a fire
protection district may distribute surplus or unneeded
supplies or property to volunteer fire protection
associations, as defined in section 320.300, to fire
protection districts, to fire departments, and to eligible
donees, as such term is defined in connection with the
federal surplus property program, in the same manner as
provided for the distribution of federal surplus property.
The board may distribute surplus or unneeded supplies or
property to an organization registered as a not-for-profit
organization pursuant to 26 U.S.C. Section 501(c)3, public
service corporation that provides training to fire
departments, emergency medical technicians, or police
officers in search and recovery techniques, water rescue,
ice rescue, or watercraft operation in the same manner as
provided for the distribution of federal surplus property.
2. The board of directors of a fire protection
district may sell surplus or unneeded supplies or property
that are not transferred to fire protection associations,
districts, or departments or eligible donees to the general
public for items with a value of five hundred dollars or
1

less provided the board, obtains the name of the purchaser,
their phone number and address, and a description of the
property sold, the amount paid and the date. Such
information shall be available to the public. For all items
with a value over five hundred dollars, such items shall be
sold by auction, sealed bid.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 1 and
2 of this section to the contrary, the board of directors of
a fire protection district may not donate or sell surplus
emergency vehicles or unneeded supplies or property to board
members, officers, or employees of the fire protection
district or their relatives within the fourth degree, by
consanguinity or affinity, nor to an entity of which a board
member, officer, or employee is a board member or officer,
unless such surplus is sold on an online auction platform
approved by the Missouri office of administration.
2